Hawaii statutes.
§465-7 Requirements for licensing. (a)
Every applicant for a license as a psychologist shall submit evidence
satisfactory to the board that the applicant meets the following requirements:

(1) The applicant for licensure shall possess a
doctoral degree from:

(A) An American Psychological Association
approved program in clinical psychology, counseling psychology, school
psychology, or programs offering combinations of two or more of these areas; or

(B) A professional psychology training
program, awarded by an institution of higher education, or from a regionally
accredited institution;

(2) The applicant for licensure shall demonstrate
that the applicant has completed one year of post doctoral supervised
experience in health service in psychology, and:

(A) An internship approved by the American
Psychological Association; or

(B) One year of supervised experience in
health service in psychology, in an internship or residency program in an
organized health service training program; and

(3) The applicant for licensure has passed an
examination as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a license
may be issued to an applicant who holds:

(1) A diplomate certificate in good standing granted
by the American Board of Professional Psychology;

(2) A current Certificate of Professional
Qualification in Psychology issued by the Association of State and Provincial
Psychology Boards; or

(3) A current National Register of Health Service
Providers in Psychology credential.

(c) A license may be issued to a senior
psychologist who:

(1) Holds a valid and current license in another
jurisdiction in which the Examination for Professional Practice in Psychology
was not required for licensure at the time of licensure or in a jurisdiction in
which the Examination for Professional Practice in Psychology was required and
the applicant obtained a score that was equal to or higher than the board's
passing score at the time the applicant sat for the Examination for
Professional Practice in Psychology;

(2) Before application in this jurisdiction, has been
licensed as a psychologist for at least twenty years in United States or
Canadian jurisdictions where that license was based on a doctoral degree. The
total of twenty years shall be obtained by counting sequential, not concurrent,
years of licensure;

(3) Has had no disciplinary sanction against the
person's license in any jurisdiction during the entire period of being licensed
as a psychologist; and

(4) Has submitted the application and fees as
required. [L 1967, c 290, pt of §1; HRS §465-7; am L 1971, c 84, §5; am L 1983,
c 95, §2; am L 1984, c 142, §1; am L 1985, c 68, §15 and c 115, §9; am L 1991,
c 91, §1; am L 1994, c 125, §3; am L 1997, c 37, §§2, 3; am L 1998, c 40, §1;
am L 2000, c 7, §2; am L 2003, c 79, §1; am L 2015, c 9, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next